hunspell/kpv/komi.aff
FLAG long
SFX V9 Y 73 # +и
SFX V9 ыны и/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны иг/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игад/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игам/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны иганыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны иганым/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны иганыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игас/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игвыв/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игкежлад/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игкежланыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игкежланым/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игкежланыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игкежлас/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игкежлӧ/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игкості/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игкостіныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игкостіным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игкостіныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игкостіыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игкостіыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игмоз/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игмозным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игмозныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игмозыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игмозыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игӧ/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игӧныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игӧным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игӧныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игӧнныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игӧнным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игӧнныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игсор/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игсорӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игтыр/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игтырйи/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игтырйиныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игтырйиным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игтырйиныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игтырйиыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игтырйиыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игчӧж/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игчӧжӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игчӧжныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игчӧжным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игчӧжныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игчӧжыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игчӧжыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игъяс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игъясад/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игъясам/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игъясаныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игъясаным/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игъясаныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игъясас/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игъясӧ/G1G2 .
SFX V9 ыны игъясӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны игъясын/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны ид/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны им/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны имӧ/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны имоз/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны имӧй/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны ин/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны инныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны ины/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны иныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны ис/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны исмоз/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны исны/G1G2G3 .
SFX V9 ыны исныс/G1G2G3 .
