hunspell/kpv/komi.dic
отделайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
замедляйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
зарвитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
совершитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
нульмӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
скрещивайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
втягивайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
регенеруйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
пагӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
горувмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
колсйӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
обрадуйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
растеряйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
штрафуйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
лешмӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
бастуйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
вӧчӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
грабитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
ёвкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
катчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
костӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
лётаммыны/W1W0V5V7V9
мӧйгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
огӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
пӧлыстчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
рӧтшнитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
тірбыльтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
шпальгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
лывгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
гӧгӧртчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
тотшйӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
чикайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
бургыны/W1W0V5V7V9
стирайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
востермыны/W1W0V5V7V9
шывкнитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
мусолитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
няйтчӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
закренитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
праватӧммыны/W1W0V5V7V9
лапкучкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
лӧзмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
публикуйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
лёткыны/W1W0V5V7V9
чужайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
клопйӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
плашкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
тутшмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
поправитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
прославляйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
бултыкнитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
передайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
ӧбжигайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
выродитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
прытьӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
мурчнитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
кӧдзовтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
подтверждайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
сформируйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
реализуйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
гузьнитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
южӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
артачитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
лӧзӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
казнитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
лӧзаммыны/W1W0V5V7V9
селитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
шлапӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
корысьмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
реконструируйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
сӧдзмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
нюмъёвтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
жалейтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
пакетируйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
полошитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
серӧмтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
отравляйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
монькоритчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
промахнитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
гатшовтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
трукавитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
возвеселитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
бавгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
боргыны/W1W0V5V7V9
брунгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
быльгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
вежгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
гаргыны/W1W0V5V7V9
грымгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
гыджгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
дзажгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
дзингыны/W1W0V5V7V9
дзузгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
дӧвгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
ёнгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
жвиньгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
жужгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
звижгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
зургыны/W1W0V5V7V9
камгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
клёнгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
коргыны/W1W0V5V7V9
лизгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
люзьгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
мургыны/W1W0V5V7V9
нунгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
овгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
плавгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
рыйгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
сургыны/W1W0V5V7V9
теньгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
тіньгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
триньгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
тювгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
чазгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
чиргыны/W1W0V5V7V9
шваргыны/W1W0V5V7V9
шлангыны/W1W0V5V7V9
шлявгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
шувгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
ызгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
лалгыны/W1W0V5V7V9
бротькыны/W1W0V5V7V9
бучкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
вачкучкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
вутшкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
гирскыны/W1W0V5V7V9
гупкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
дзурскыны/W1W0V5V7V9
ётшкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
жмуткыны/W1W0V5V7V9
зупкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
калскыны/W1W0V5V7V9
кильскыны/W1W0V5V7V9
клотшкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
котшкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
курчкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
лёшкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
матшкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
начкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
нюшкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
польскыны/W1W0V5V7V9
пушкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
сатшкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
тапкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
тіпкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
точкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
тшетшкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
тяпкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
чирскыны/W1W0V5V7V9
чуткыны/W1W0V5V7V9
шварскыны/W1W0V5V7V9
шлапкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
шлюпкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
шняпкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
шушкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
ярскыны/W1W0V5V7V9
нёшкыны/W1W0V5V7V9
булскыны/W1W0V5V7V9
куткыны/W1W0V5V7V9
вушмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
лапмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
жебмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
винёвмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
здоровмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
палюрмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
падмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
тодмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
гырдмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
югыдмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
долыдмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
курыдмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
важмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
мыжмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
ваймыны/W1W0V5V7V9
лысӧймыны/W1W0V5V7V9
ӧкмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
югаммыны/W1W0V5V7V9
тӧлкаммыны/W1W0V5V7V9
сьӧктаммыны/W1W0V5V7V9
чӧскыдтӧммыны/W1W0V5V7V9
гӧлӧстӧммыны/W1W0V5V7V9
кузяммыны/W1W0V5V7V9
мевъяммыны/W1W0V5V7V9
кынмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
сирмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
дурмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
исмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
нюрсмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
прӧстмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
лошмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
садьмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
омӧльмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
косьмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
сигӧрмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
пашкырмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
преставитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
опылитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
зёлькнитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
шешӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
шувӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
зӧркӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
дойдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
шлювӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
дзодзгӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
сунгӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
лёзьгӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
кӧдздӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
турдӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
кежӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
судзӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
сайӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
чилйӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
тшавкӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
тіпкӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
зуркӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
тёльскӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
тоткӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
вашкӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
тотшкӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
зялькӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
чилӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
мевмӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
измӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
раммӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
скӧрмӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
гымӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
блёнӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
шлёпӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
дзерӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
гурӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
ворсӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
войтӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
вештӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
личӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
мытшӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
дӧнзьӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
гильӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
шыльӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
жвуньӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
польдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
ванъёвтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
саймовтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
кытшовтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
сювтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
любитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
нажӧвитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
пӧдрадитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
гӧдитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
имеитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
держитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
лебезитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
чумалитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
шыбӧлитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
шванитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
чажнитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
ёвкнитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
зӧркнитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
ылькнитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
кокорнитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
точнитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
упокоитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
прӧступитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
шпалеритчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
якӧритчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
веситчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
зӧлӧтитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
гӧститчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
тӧчитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
копошитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
пещитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
призывайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
дӧгадайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
макайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
тышлайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
старайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
братайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
рӧщӧтайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
якшайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
любуйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
преобразуйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
жалуйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
субстантивируйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
маскируйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
котируйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
коксуйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
вещуйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
определяйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
извиняйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
гартчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
чатӧртчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
пагыртчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
линьгыртчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
вешкыртчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
котыртчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
вылыстчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
койыштчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
киськыштчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
идрыштчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
бертовтыштчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
парсасьыштчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
багыльтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
бугжыльтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
йитшкыльтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
вежыньтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
дӧлжитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
стесняйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
тальччыны/W1W0V5V7V9
восторгайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
сохранитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
нарушайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
включитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
тічкӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
придеритчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
зумбыртчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
разрывайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
мудеритчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
ломайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
сунгыртчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
зутшнитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
шышкӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
играйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
опомнитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
нравитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
гормыны/W1W0V5V7V9
визнитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
мугырмыны/W1W0V5V7V9
сохраняйтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
плеснитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
яныштчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
увгӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
бытшнитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
подтвердитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
случайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
видзӧдыштчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
лаймовтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
лишайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
одолжайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
унаммыны/W1W0V5V7V9
ляпӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
клёцкӧдчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
вульскыны/W1W0V5V7V9
размножитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
выветритчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
обусловливайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
упрочитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
поразитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
превращайтчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
укрупнитчыны/W1W0V5V7V9
гӧрддзыны/W5W0V5V7V9
рушйыны/W6V5V7V9
палсйыны/W6V5V7V9
тшӧкйыны/W6V5V7V9
арйыны/W6V5V7V9
вашйыны/W6V5V7V9
гирйыны/W6V5V7V9
дзӧвйыны/W6V5V7V9
журсйыны/W6V5V7V9
кильсйыны/W6V5V7V9
лупйыны/W6V5V7V9
няшйыны/W6V5V7V9
посйыны/W6V5V7V9
резйыны/W6V5V7V9
сувйыны/W6V5V7V9
тӧвйыны/W6V5V7V9
увкйыны/W6V5V7V9
чирйыны/W6V5V7V9
шелькйыны/W6V5V7V9
ызйыны/W6V5V7V9
пызьйыны/W8W9V5V7V9
